Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3315
Veterinarian, defined.

Veterinarian means a person who has received a degree of Doctor of Veterinary Medicine from an accredited school of veterinary medicine or its equivalent.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1097.